Louisiana, session 2026, HB1037.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 36:502(A) and (B), 503, 505(A) and (B), 506(A) through (C), 508(A)
through (C) and (F), 508.2(A) through (C), (E), and (F), and 508.6(C) and (D) are hereby
amended and reenacted and R.S. 36:505.1 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§502. Officers of the department; compensation for one office only
A.(1) The officers of the department shall be the secretary, undersecretary,
deputy secretary, chief operating officer, assistant secretary of project delivery,
commissioner of multimodal commerce, and assistant secretary of operations, each
of whom shall be selected and shall perform functions as provided in this Title.
(2) The secretary, undersecretary, deputy secretary, chief operating officer,
assistant secretary of project delivery, assistant secretary of operations, executive
Page 1 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1037 ENROLLED
director of the Offshore Terminal Authority, commissioner of multimodal
commerce, and such other positions which may be authorized by the State Civil
Service Commission or the state constitution shall be unclassified positions in the
Department of Transportation and Development. All other positions in the
department may be in the classified state service. The secretary shall fill such
positions as in his opinion and judgment are necessary to the operation of the
department in accordance with applicable rules and regulations of the State Civil
Service Commission and applicable law.
B. No person serving as a secretary, undersecretary, deputy secretary, chief
operating officer, assistant secretary of project delivery, assistant secretary of
operations, commissioner of multimodal commerce, or in any other office in the
department shall receive any additional salary from the state other than that salary
which he receives by virtue of serving in any one of such offices. Any statewide
elected official appointed to serve as a secretary or deputy secretary shall not receive
any additional salary from the state other than that salary which he receives as a
statewide elected official.
* * *
§503. Secretary of transportation and development
There shall be a secretary of transportation and development who shall be
appointed by the governor with consent of the Senate. He shall serve at the pleasure
of the governor at a salary fixed by the governor, which salary shall not exceed the
amount approved for such position by the legislature while in session. He shall be
the appointing authority for the department in accordance with civil service rules and
regulations. The secretary shall serve as the executive head and chief administrative
officer of the Department of Transportation and Development and shall have the
responsibility for the policies of the department, except as specifically provided for
particular agencies transferred to or placed within the department by other provisions
of this Title. He shall also be responsible for the administration, control, and
operation of the functions, programs, and affairs of the department; provided that the
Page 2 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1037 ENROLLED
secretary shall perform his functions under the general control and supervision of the
governor.
* * *
§505. Deputy secretary; functions; office of transformation
A. There shall be a deputy secretary of the department, who shall be
appointed by the governor and shall serve as the appointing authority for the office
of transformation. He shall serve at the pleasure of the governor at a salary fixed by
the governor, which salary shall not exceed the amount approved for such position
by the legislature while in session. The duties and functions of the deputy secretary
shall be to serve as the chief administrative officer and oversee the office of
transformation which shall include all duties, responsibilities, and authorities
necessary and lawful to optimize the department and those otherwise assigned by the
secretary. He shall serve as acting secretary in the absence of the secretary.
B. If the position of deputy secretary is not filled during the absence of the
secretary, the secretary may designate either the undersecretary or the assistant
secretary for project delivery chief operating officer to serve as acting secretary in
his absence. The secretary shall notify the governor in writing of his temporary
appointment of an acting secretary in his absence. The governor shall have the full
authority to revoke the appointment. In no event shall the temporary appointment
exceed thirty days in length, except with the specific written approval of the
governor. The governor may appoint a temporary secretary to act in the absence or
incapacity of the secretary if an acting secretary has not been appointed.
* * *
§505.1. Chief operating officer; functions; office of project delivery
There shall be a chief operating officer of the department, who shall be
appointed by the secretary. He shall serve at the pleasure of the secretary at a salary
fixed by the governor, which shall not exceed the amount approved for the position
by the legislature while in session. The duties and functions of the chief operating
officer shall be to supervise and direct the assistant secretary of the office of project
Page 3 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1037 ENROLLED
delivery and the assistant secretary of operations and those duties otherwise assigned
by the secretary.
§506. Undersecretary; functions; office of management and finance
A. There shall be an undersecretary of the Department of Transportation and
Development who shall be appointed by the governor. He shall serve at the pleasure
of the secretary at a salary fixed by the governor, which salary shall not exceed the
amount approved for such position by the legislature while in session, and shall
receive an annual salary payable monthly out of funds appropriated therefor, and
shall be allowed his actual necessary traveling expenses incurred in the discharge of
his official duties. The undersecretary shall be directly responsible to and shall
perform his functions under the supervision and control of the secretary and the
deputy secretary.
B. The undersecretary shall direct and be responsible for the functions of the
office of management and finance within the Department of Transportation and
Development. In such this capacity he shall be responsible for accounting and
budget control, procurement, data processing, management and program analysis,
personnel management, and grants management for the department and all of its
offices, including all agencies transferred to the Department of Transportation and
Development, except as otherwise specifically provided in this Title. He shall
employ, appoint, remove, assign, and promote such personnel as is necessary for the
efficient administration of the office of management and finance and the
performance of its powers, duties, functions, and responsibilities, in accordance with
applicable civil service laws, rules, and regulations, and with policies and rules of
the department, all subject to budgetary control and applicable laws. The
undersecretary shall exercise all powers and authority granted to him in this Title
subject to the overall direction and control of the secretary and the deputy secretary.
C. The duties and functions of the office of management and finance and of
the undersecretary shall be as provided in this Section, and these duties and functions
shall not be subject to change by the secretary or the deputy secretary, except that the
Page 4 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1037 ENROLLED
undersecretary shall perform such additional duties and functions as are assigned by
the secretary or the deputy secretary.
* * *
§508. Office of project delivery; functions; assistant secretary; powers and duties
A. There is hereby created within the Department of Transportation and
Development, the office of project delivery, which shall administer engineering
matters related to the state's highway program with respect to project development,
planning, design, construction, maintenance, extension, improvement, and regulation
of roads, highways, expressways, bridges, and related matters, and any other special
highway engineering program as may be directed by the secretary or the chief
operating officer. The office shall also administer the public works functions of the
state related to flood and drainage control, reclamation, water resources, soil
conservation, mapping, disaster relief, and related matters, the state's participation
in the National Flood Insurance Program, 42 U.S.C. 4001 et seq., and other special
programs as may be directed by the secretary or the chief operating officer.
B. The office of project delivery shall be under the immediate supervision
of the assistant secretary, who shall be appointed by the secretary. The assistant
secretary shall serve at the pleasure of the secretary and under the direct supervision
of the chief operating officer. He may be licensed to practice civil engineering in
Louisiana. The assistant secretary shall give his whole time to the duties of his
office.
C. The assistant secretary shall have authority subject to approval of the
secretary or chief operating officer and in accordance with applicable rules and
regulations of the civil service commission to employ, appoint, transfer, assign, and
promote such personnel as is necessary for the efficient administration of the office
of project delivery.
* * *
F. The chief engineer shall approve all plans, specifications, and estimates
for the construction of all facilities and projects for which his the office is
responsible. He also shall have such other duties as may be assigned to him by the
Page 5 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1037 ENROLLED
secretary or the assistant secretary, by the provisions of this Chapter, or by the laws
of this state. He shall report the his proceedings of his office annually to the
secretary of the department and at such other times as the secretary may designate,
and he shall make any additional reports as are required by the secretary.
* * *
§508.2. Office of operations; functions; assistant secretary; powers and duties
A. There is hereby created within the Department of Transportation and
Development, the office of operations, which shall administer all matters related to
the operations of the department's district offices and other matters as may be
directed by the secretary or the chief operating officer.
B. The office of operations shall be under the immediate supervision of the
assistant secretary, who shall be appointed by the governor and shall serve at the
pleasure of the secretary and under the direct supervision of the chief operating
officer.
C. The assistant secretary shall have authority, subject to approval of the
secretary or the chief operating officer and in accordance with applicable rules and
regulations of the civil service commission, to employ, appoint, transfer, assign, and
promote such personnel as is necessary for the efficient administration of the office
of operations.
* * *
E. The assistant secretary shall administer all department functions and
duties for which the office of operations is responsible. He shall also have such other
duties as may be assigned to him by the secretary or the chief operating officer, by
the provisions of this Chapter, or by the laws of this state. He shall report the his
proceedings of his office annually to the secretary of the department chief operating
officer and at such other times as the secretary chief operating officer may designate,
and he shall make any additional reports as are required by the secretary chief
operating officer.
F. The secretary or the chief operating officer is specifically authorized and
empowered to perform any of the duties of the assistant secretary when the assistant
Page 6 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1037 ENROLLED
secretary is absent or incapacitated or when in the opinion of the secretary or the
chief operating officer it would be in the best interest of the department. The
assistant secretary with approval of the secretary chief operating officer may
designate a senior staff member in the office of operations to perform any duties
required of the assistant secretary.
* * *
§508.6. Departmental reform; directive and authority to restructure and organize
* * *
C. The department shall have enacted comprehensive, department-wide
reforms of the access permit process to include the policy, administrative code,
engineering directives and standards manual, and online application processes by
June 30, 2026 2027.
D. The department shall modernize and reform project development and
execution across the entire department to stabilize letting and to remit payments to
vendors and contractors on a bi-monthly basis, consistent with the terms of its
contracts, no later than June 30, 2026 2027.
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
of the governor, as provided in Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 7 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.